Wyoming, session 2025, HB0099.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-303 by creating a new subsection
(d) and 23-3-305(b) are amended to read:

6-3-303. Criminal trespass; penalties; exception.

(d) For purposes of this section, a person does not
commit criminal trespass if the person incidentally passes
HB0099

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0513
through the airspace or touches the land or premises of
another person while the person is traveling from one (1)
parcel of land that the person is authorized to access to
another parcel of land that shares a common corner with or
is immediately connected to the first parcel and that the
person is authorized to access.

23-3-305. Hunting from highway; entering enclosed
property without permission; penalty; hunting at night
without permission prohibited; exception.

(b) No person shall enter upon, travel through or
return across the private property of any person to take
wildlife, hunt, fish, collect antlers or horns, or trap
without the permission of the owner or person in charge of
the property. Violation of this subsection constitutes a
low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S.
23-6-202(a)(v). For purposes of this subsection, "travel
through or return across" requires physically touching or
driving on the surface of the private property. For
purposes of this subsection, a person does not commit
trespass under this subsection if the person incidentally
passes through the airspace or touches the land or premises
HB0099

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0513
of another person while the person is traveling from one
(1) parcel of land that the person is authorized to access
to another parcel of land that shares a common corner with
or is immediately connected to the first parcel and that
the person is authorized to access.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0099